District of Columbia statutes.
26-1120.02

Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reporting requirements.

(a)

The Commissioner shall regularly report violations of this chapter, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the NMLSR. The reports shall be subject to the provisions of § 26-1120.01.

(b)

Each licensee shall submit to the NMLSR reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the NMLSR may require.

History

Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-155, § 21b
as added July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-38, § 2(o), 56 DCR 4290

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-38 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. Except for section 2(c)(1), (g), (j), and (o), this act shall not apply until the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking has promulgated rules implementing this act.”